Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
57-5-106. Licensing powers of cities, towns, and Class B counties.

All incorporated cities, towns and Class B counties in this state are authorized to pass proper ordinances governing the issuance and revocation or suspension of licenses for the storage, sale, manufacture and/or distribution of beer within the corporate limits of the cities and towns and within the general services districts of Class B counties outside the limits of any smaller cities as defined in § 7-1-101 and to provide a board of persons before whom such application shall be made, but the power of such cities, towns and Class B counties to issue licenses shall in no event be greater than the power herein granted to counties, but cities, towns and Class B counties may impose additional restrictions, fixing zones and territories and provide hours of opening and closing and such other rules and regulations as will promote public health, morals and safety as they may by ordinance provide. The ordinance power granted to a municipality by this subsection (a) does not permit a municipality to establish residency requirements for its applicants. The ordinance power granted to a municipality by this section does not permit a municipality to impose training or certification restrictions or requirements on employees of a permittee if those employees possess a server permit issued by the alcoholic beverage commission pursuant to chapter 3, part 7 of this title.

Cities, towns and Class B counties may authorize the sale of beer in the rooms of regularly conducted hotels and motels and in regularly incorporated clubs and lodges.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any county that is the owner of property used as a park that is within the corporate boundaries of a municipality within that county has the exclusive authority to issue, revoke, and suspend licenses for the storage, sale, manufacture, and distribution of beer within the boundaries of the park consistent with the county rules governing the issuance, revocation, and suspension of licenses for other locations in the county, except there is no restriction of distance from residences or churches, schools, or other public gathering places.

This subsection (c) applies only in counties with a population of not less than one hundred seventy-two thousand three hundred (172,300) nor more than one hundred seventy-two thousand four hundred (172,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.14; Acts 1965, ch. 321, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 57-208; Acts 1981, ch. 377, § 1; 1983, ch. 386, § 6; 1993, ch. 297, § 7; 1993, ch. 451, § 3; T.C.A., §57-5-108; Acts 1995, ch. 396, § 8; 2018, ch. 944, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-106, concerning bond requirements for alcoholic beverages warehousemen, dealers and manufacturers, was transferred to §57-5-110 in 1993.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 944, § 4. May 15, 2018.

Cross-References. Prohibited acts, title 57, ch. 5, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 4, 5, 9.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1964 Tennessee Survey (E. Blythe Stason), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1047.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of Dyersburg City ordinance pertaining to beer, OAG 94-120 (10/10/94).

Municipal beer ordinances, OAG 96-020 (2/16/96).

Authority of board, committee, or individual members to revoke beer permits, OAG 97-060 (5/1/97).

A city controls the traffic of beer within its corporate limits by virtue of its permit-issuing power and the ordinances it passes to delineate and enforce this power; a referendum is not necessary to approve beer sales in an incorporated city and the legislature has not given cities the right to conduct such a referendum, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

Prohibiting the sale of beer through drive-up windows. OAG 10-113, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (11/18/10).

57-5-107. Hotels and motels.

Any hotel or motel licensed under this chapter and under chapter 4 of this title may dispense beer to adult guests through locked, in-room units.

No person under the age of twenty-one (21) shall be issued or supplied with a key by any hotel or motel for such units. Such units may only be located in any such hotel or motel located in municipalities having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) if the voters of such municipality have approved the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises by referendum and in any county in which such municipalities are located if the voters of such county have approved the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises by referendum.

Acts 1989, ch. 145, § 2; 1993, ch. 297, § 10; T.C.A., §57-5-111.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-107 (Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 10; 1933, ch. 133, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-207), concerning bonds of retailers, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 676, § 1.

Acts 1989, ch. 145, § 3 provided that the alcoholic beverage commission is authorized to promulgate any rules which may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

For tables of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Premises on which certain sales and consumption authorized, §57-4-101.

57-5-108. Revocation or suspension of permits or licenses — Civil penalty — Review of orders — Pilot project concerning local and municipal beer boards.

Permits or licenses issued under this chapter by any county legislative body or any committee or board created by any county legislative body may be revoked or suspended in accordance with this section by the county legislative body, committee or board which issued the permit or license.

Permits or licenses issued under this chapter by any board or commission created by the metropolitan council of any Class B county may be revoked or suspended in accordance with this section by such board or commission.

Permits or licenses issued under this chapter by the governmental body of any incorporated city, or by any committee or board created by such governmental body may be revoked or suspended in accordance with this section by the governmental body, committee or board which issued the permit or license.

A city, Class A county, or Class B county, or any committee, board, or commission created by these governmental bodies, shall not, pursuant to § 57-5-608, revoke or suspend the permit of a responsible vendor for a clerk's illegal sale of beer to a minor, if the permit or license holder and the clerk making the sale have complied with the requirements of § 57-5-606 as a responsible vendor under this part, but may impose on the responsible vendor a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense of making or permitting to be made any sales to minors or for any other offense.

The prohibition of subdivision (a)(2)(A) concerning the revocation or suspension of the vendor's permit shall not apply to any vendor who is not a responsible vendor under this part, or to a participating vendor, if the vendor or clerk making a sale to a minor fails to comply with the requirements of § 57-5-606. With respect to such permit or license holder, the committee, board, or commission may, at the time it imposes a revocation or suspension, offer the permit or license holder the alternative of paying a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each offense of making or permitting to be made any sales to minors, or a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for any other offense.

Permanent revocation of beer permits may only be applied when the permit holder has at least two (2) violations within a twelve-month period.

Revocation of beer permits applies only to that permit holder, or agents of the permit holder, at that location. Revocation of beer permits shall not stay with the property if the property changes hands, nor may a city, Class A county or Class B county, or any committee, board or commission created by these governmental bodies, apply penalties, suspensions or revocations to other beer permits held by the permittee at other locations.

Revocation of a beer permit at one (1) location should not be the sole disqualifying factor when considering the issuance of beer permits at other locations.

If, at any location that has been affected by permanent beer permit revocation, the property changes hands and no longer belongs to the permit holder, or agents of the permit holder, the new property owner may apply to the beer board for release of revocation.

If a civil penalty is offered as an alternative to revocation or suspension, where allowed under subdivision (a)(2)(B), the holder shall have seven (7) days within which to pay the civil penalty before the revocation or suspension shall be imposed. If the civil penalty is paid within that time, the revocation or suspension shall be deemed withdrawn. The holder's payment of a civil penalty shall not affect the holder's ability to seek review of the civil penalty pursuant to subsection (d).

A city or county may at any time accept the payment of a civil penalty, not to exceed the amounts set forth in subdivision (a)(2)(B), by a permit or license holder charged with a violation of this chapter, which payment shall be an admission by the holder of the violation so charged and shall be paid to the exclusion of any other penalty that the city or county may impose.

No permit or license shall be revoked on the grounds the operator or any person working for the operator sells beer to a minor over the age of eighteen (18) years if such minor exhibits an identification, false or otherwise, indicating the minor's age to be twenty-one (21) or over, if the minor's appearance as to maturity is such that the minor might reasonably be presumed to be of such age and is unknown to such person making the sale. The license or permit may be suspended for a period not to exceed ten (10) days or a civil penalty up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) may be imposed pursuant to subdivision (a)(3). However, this shall not be construed in any way to relieve the minor from liability for making such illegal purchase as provided in § 57-5-301.

Such revocation, suspension, or imposition of civil penalty may be made for any violation of any provision of this chapter or whenever it shall satisfactorily appear that the premises of any person, firm or corporation holding a permit or license under this chapter are being maintained and operated in such manner as to be detrimental to public health, safety or morals. The board in considering the suspension or revocation of a license shall consider repeated violations of any local ordinance or state law involving prohibited sexual contact on the premises of an adult oriented establishment.

The action of such agency in connection with the issuance of any order of any kind, including the revocation or suspension of a license or permit, imposition of a civil penalty or the refusal to grant a license or permit under §§ 57-5-105, 57-5-106 and this section, may be reviewed by statutory writ of certiorari, with a trial de novo as a substitute for an appeal, the petition of certiorari to be addressed to the circuit or chancery court of the county in which any such order was issued.

Immediately upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the agency revoking or suspending a license or permit or imposing a civil penalty shall cause to be made, certified and forwarded to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings in the cause.

This section shall be the sole remedy and exclusive method of review of any action or order that may have been issued by any county legislative body, or any committee appointed by any county legislative body, or from any board or commission authorized under §§ 57-5-105 and 57-5-106, including the refusal or failure to grant any license or permit or the imposition of a civil penalty. The Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure shall be applicable in connection with such review. Any party dissatisfied with the decree of the court may, upon giving bond as required in other cases, appeal, where the cause shall be heard upon the transcript of the records from the circuit court.

A judge of any court of record shall have the authority to supersede, stay or enjoin any order of an agency revoking, suspending or imposing a civil penalty made under the authority of this chapter for good cause shown on part of the petitioning party thereof. No circuit or chancery judge shall have the authority to grant any such extraordinary writ except the judge of a court of record to which the petition for certiorari is addressed.

If a final judgment is entered by the trial court superseding the revocation or suspension order or order imposing a civil penalty, and the cause is appealed by the agency, the final judgment of the trial court shall remain in force until final appellate disposition of the cause.

In instances involving only wholesale beer permits or licenses, or certificates of registration, the order of the agency suspending, revoking or failing to renew such wholesale beer permits or licenses or certificates of registration or imposing civil penalties shall as a matter of law be stayed or superseded, and the order will not be effective until final judicial review, including all available appeals, of the matter. In instances where no appeal is taken or perfected by the wholesaler within the required time as prescribed by law, the order of the agency shall become effective.

The remedy provided by this section shall be the only method of reviewing orders of county legislative bodies, governing bodies or municipal corporations, boards or committees revoking or suspending licenses issued under this chapter or imposing civil penalties.

Where a permit or license is revoked, no new license or permit shall be issued to permit the sale of beer on the same premises until after the expiration of one (1) year from the date the revocation becomes final and effective. The board, in its discretion, may determine that issuance of a license or permit before the expiration of one (1) year from the date of revocation becomes final is appropriate, if the individual applying for such issuance is not the original holder of the license or any family member who could inherit from such individual under the statute of intestate succession.

Powers to suspend, revoke, or impose civil penalties conferred in this section upon county legislative bodies and governmental bodies of incorporated cities and any committees, commissions, or boards created by such bodies and/or governmental bodies are likewise conferred upon the commissioner of revenue as they may relate to certificates of registration and transportation permits issued by the commissioner under this chapter to any licensed brewer, wholesaler or distributor for the failure of any such person to file with the commissioner any report required by this chapter, or for the filing of a false report, or the failure to pay tax due by any such licensee under this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, or for the receipt, possession, storage or transportation of beer in violation of this chapter, or any rule and regulation promulgated by the commissioner thereunder, and for no other reason. The remedy provided by this section shall likewise be the only method of reviewing orders of the commissioner revoking or suspending certificates of registration and transportation permits issued under this chapter or imposing civil penalties.

Any county, municipal or metropolitan beer board or committee may, at its discretion, revoke or suspend the permit of or impose a civil penalty pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) on any beer retailer within its jurisdiction who is found to possess beer on which the state beer barrelage tax, imposed by § 57-5-201, and the city and county wholesale beer tax, imposed by § 57-6-103, has not been paid. The burden of proof shall be upon the retail beer permit holder to show that the two (2) taxes on the beer in the permit holder's possession have been paid by showing that the beer was purchased from a Tennessee beer wholesaler, which fact shall be shown by the retailer providing a bill of sale or invoice for the beer which shall include the name and address of the wholesaler, the name and address of the retailer, the number of containers of each brand of beer purchased by the retailer, and which shall be signed by the retailer.

As a pilot project to terminate July 1, 2014, unless extended by the general assembly, when a local or municipal beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages within any county included within subsection (p), finds violations, as defined in this chapter, in the sale of beer or malt beverages consumed on-premises of an establishment located within the local or municipal beer board's jurisdiction that result in the beer board suspending the operation of or revoking the permit of the establishment where the violation occurred, the beer board is authorized to notify the executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the action taken by the beer board. Such notice shall include the record of evidence and the determination made by the beer board in suspending or revoking the permit.

Upon receipt of such notice, the executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission shall take the actions required pursuant to § 57-4-202(b) with respect to violations as defined in chapter 4 of this title related to the license for the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises at the location where the violation of this chapter occurred.

The suspension or revocation decision of the beer board made pursuant to subdivision (n)(1)(A) is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the beer board in accordance with the appeal procedures of this chapter.

As a pilot project to terminate July 1, 2014, unless extended by the general assembly, if, pursuant to § 57-4-202(c), the alcoholic beverage commission sends a certified letter, return receipt requested to the local or municipal beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages within any county included within subsection (p), providing notice that the commission has suspended or revoked the license of an establishment for a violation of chapter 4 of this title, upon receipt of the certified letter, the beer board shall:

Schedule a hearing for the next regularly scheduled meeting of the beer board to be held at least fourteen (14) days following the date the beer board receives the certified letter to provide an opportunity for the permit holder to appear and show cause why the permit to sell beer on the premises should not be suspended or revoked for violations of this chapter based on actions taken by the alcoholic beverage commission pursuant to § 57-4-202(c); and

Notify the individual or business entity, which is listed as the permit holder at the same location where the alcoholic beverage license had been suspended or revoked, of the date and time of the hearing.

If the beer board finds that a sufficient violation or violations of this chapter have occurred at such location, then the beer board shall suspend or revoke the permit to the same extent and at least for the same period of time as the alcoholic beverage commission has suspended or revoked the license of the establishment pursuant to § 57-4-202(c).

If the permit holder fails to appear or decides to surrender the permit to the beer board in lieu of appearing at the hearing, the permit shall be suspended or revoked by the beer board, and no permit to sell beer or malt beverages on the premises shall be issued by the beer board to any person for the location where the alcoholic beverage commission had suspended or revoked the license pursuant to § 57-4-202(c) for the period of time included in the decision of the alcoholic beverage commission.

The decision of the beer board is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the beer board in accordance with this chapter.

The pilot project established by subsections (n) and (o) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

6,800 6,900

19,100 19,150

22,600 22,675

32,200 32,300

35,600 35,700

51,400 51,500

56,800 56,900

336,400 336,500

432,200 432,300

Acts 1943, ch. 53, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.14; Acts 1961, ch. 105, § 2; 1965, ch. 123, § 1; 1965, ch. 321, § 4; 1969, ch. 56, § 1; 1969, ch. 299, § 1; 1971, ch. 21, § 1; 1973, ch. 68, § 7; 1977, ch. 454, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-209; Acts 1981, ch. 377, §§ 2-9; 1981, ch. 449, § 2; 1984, ch. 1006, § 7; 1985, ch. 315, § 2; 1989, ch. 147, § 6; 1989, ch. 583, §§ 1-4; 1990, ch. 889, § 1; 1993, ch. 297, § 8; 1993, ch. 349, § 1; T.C.A., §57-5-109; Acts 1996, ch. 641, § 1; 2006, ch. 864, § 11; 2012, ch. 742, § 1; 2012, ch. 881, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1989, ch. 147, § 12 provided that any and all matters filed or pending as of July 1, 1989, shall be disposed of under prior law.

Acts 1989, ch. 583, § 5 provided the amendment by that act applies to the review of any action or order issued on or after July 1, 1989.

Former §57-5-108, concerning the alcoholic beverage licensing powers of cities, towns and class B counties, was transferred to §57-5-106 in 1993.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Eighteen-year-olds, legal responsibility, alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under 21, §1-3-113.

Intestate succession, title 31, ch. 2.

Prohibited acts, title 57, ch. 5, part 3.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 664.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 4, 5, 7, 9, 22; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 52.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review under the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act — An Update (Ben H. Cantrell), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 589 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality and applicability, OAG 90-77 (8/13/90).

A vendor who is caught selling beer to a minor is subject to criminal penalties imposed by the local criminal court ranging from a class A misdemeanor to a class E felony and is also subject to the suspension or revocation of his permit imposed by the local beer board, OAG 01-062 (4/20/01).

A city controls the traffic of beer within its corporate limits by virtue of its permit-issuing power and the ordinances it passes to delineate and enforce this power; a referendum is not necessary to approve beer sales in an incorporated city and the legislature has not given cities the right to conduct such a referendum, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

The imposition of fines greater than fifty dollars by a municipal beer board pursuant to T.C.A. §57-5-108(2)(A) does not implicate Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 14, OAG 05-056 (4/20/05).

All disciplinary powers accorded by T.C.A. §57-5-108(2)(A) are constitutionally available to municipal beer boards, OAG 05-056 (4/20/05).

Implementation of beer permit distance requirement. OAG 10-98, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (9/15/10).

57-5-109. Proximity to schools, residences, churches, places of public gatherings.

A city or county shall not suspend, revoke or deny a permit to a business engaged in selling, distributing or manufacturing beer on the basis of the proximity of the business to a school, residence, church, or other place of public gathering if a valid permit had been issued to any business on that same location. This section shall not apply if beer is not sold, distributed or manufactured at that location during any continuous six-month period.

For the purposes of this section, “on that same location” means within the boundaries of the parcel or tract of the real property on which the business was located. This section applies whether or not a business moves the building on the location and whether or not the business was a conforming or nonconforming use at the time of the move.

If a business applies for a beer permit within the continuous six-month period referenced in this section, and if the city or county denies the business a permit and if the business appeals that denial, a new six-month continuous sale period shall begin to run on the date when the appeal of that denial is final.

Acts 1993, ch. 297, § 9; 1997, ch. 560, § 1; 2002, ch. 744, § 1; 2004, ch. 598, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-109, concerning the revocation of alcoholic beverage permits and licenses, was transferred to §57-5-108 in 1993.

Attorney General Opinions. Distance requirements for beer sales in Washington County, OAG 94-110 (10/6/94).

Loss of grandfathered beer permit status, OAG 98-022 (1/23/98); OAG 98-069 (3/25/98).

A county can reestablish a beer permit distance rule without revoking a permit to sell beer previously issued to a business that does not meet that rule, and the continued existence of such a “grandfathered” permit will not invalidate the reinstatement of the rule or imposition of a new distance rule, OAG 01-157 (10/25/01).

If a county legislative body had passed a resolution prohibiting the issuance of a beer permit for locations within two thousand feet of schools, churches, or other places of public gathering, and later issued permits in violation of such distance requirement, it could not at a later date readopt such a distance restriction, the effect of which would basically grandfather all such permits without revoking all permits issued in violation of the earlier adopted distance, OAG 04-012 (2/03/04).

A county legislative body may adopt a distance requirement of less than two thousand feet by setting the distance at a point which would basically grandfather all permits issued in violation of an earlier two thousand foot distance, OAG 04-012 (2/03/04).

57-5-110. Bonds of warehousemen, dealers and manufacturers — Terms and conditions — Alternative collateral.

All persons, firms, corporations, joint-stock companies, syndicates or associations in this state storing, selling, distributing and/or manufacturing beer in this state shall execute a bond securing the payment of the taxes levied, as the state privilege tax, under provisions hereof, the bond to be payable to the commissioner of revenue and to be signed by some solvent surety company residing in or having an office and agent in this state, and to be approved by the commissioner.

Such bond shall be conditioned upon and posted to secure the proper payment of all taxes for which the taxpayer may become liable during the taxpayer's initial license period of twelve (12) months, in the minimum penal sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); provided, that after monthly reports have been received by the department which cover the initial three (3) full months of such person's operating experience, the penal sum may, upon written request of the taxpayer, be adjusted to an amount equal to no less than twice the amount of the tax required to be paid by such person per month and shall be determined by averaging such tax over the period of months immediately preceding the adjustment. If, at any time after the initial three (3) months operating experience, the commissioner shall determine the average monthly tax liability of a taxpayer to be greater than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the taxpayer shall be required to immediately file a rider to the taxpayer's bond to increase the penal sum of the bond to two (2) times the taxpayer's average monthly tax liability as determined by the commissioner.

If, at any time after the execution of the bond, the surety thereon shall become insolvent, the commissioner may require the execution of a new bond with good and solvent surety in the same manner and with the same penalty as aforementioned, and subject to the approval of the commissioner, and any person executing a bond under this chapter may, at any time prior to default under any existing bond, apply to the commissioner for cancellation of the existing bond and for leave to file a new bond with new surety thereon in accordance with the provisions aforementioned, and shall have the right to file such new bond, at such time, by and with the approval of the commissioner.

In lieu of a corporate surety on such bond as required by subsection (a), the commissioner may allow the applicant to secure such bond by depositing collateral in the form of a certificate of deposit as accepted and authorized by the banking laws of this state, which has a face value equal to the amount of the bond. Such collateral may be deposited with any authorized state depository designated by the commissioner.

If a taxpayer has been in continuous operation for three (3) consecutive years and during the preceding six (6) months has paid the special privilege tax in § 57-5-201(a)(1), for which the taxpayer is liable within the time period for payment set by the statute or rule, then the taxpayer shall not be required to execute and maintain any bond required by this section.

Any taxpayer exempted from the bonding requirement of this section who fails to pay the special privilege tax in § 57-5-201(a)(1), within the time period for payment set by statute or rule shall, upon such failure, be required to execute and maintain a bond as required in this section.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-206; Acts 1983, ch. 379, §§ 1-3; 1986, ch. 676, § 2; 1988, ch. 519, § 1; 1992, ch. 607, § 1; 1993, ch. 297, § 6; T.C.A., §57-5-106.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 771, § 1), concerning alcoholic beverage licensee's responsibility to prominently display sign warning of felonious consequences of carrying weapon onto premises where alcoholic beverages are sold or served, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 259, § 1.

Former §57-5-110 was transferred to §57-5-109 in 1993.

57-5-111. Homemade beer.

For purposes of this section:

“Beer” has the same meaning as the term is defined in § 57-5-101(b); and

“Homemade,” with respect to the making of beer, means beer made by a person's own efforts and not for a commercial purpose, but does not require that the beer be made in the person's home.

No license or permit shall be required under this title for the making of homemade beer, and the possession, transportation, or storage of homemade beer, by any person if all of the following apply:

The person who makes the beer receives no compensation;

The beer is not sold or offered for sale; and

The total quantity of beer made, in a calendar year, by the person and any other person living in the same household does not exceed one hundred gallons (100 gal.) if the household has only one (1) person of legal drinking age or two hundred gallons (200 gal.) if the household has two (2) or more persons of legal drinking age.

A person who makes, possesses, transports, or stores beer in compliance with the limitations specified in subdivision (b)(1) is not a manufacturer of beer for purposes of this chapter.

Any homemade beer in compliance with subdivision (b)(1) that is being transported shall be clearly identified as homemade beer.

Homemade beer made in compliance with the limitations in subdivision (b)(1) may be consumed by the person who made it and the person's family, neighbors, and friends at any private residence or other private location where the possession and consumption of beer is permissible under this chapter, local ordinances, or other applicable law. This subdivision (b)(4) does not apply to licensed premises under this chapter.

The use of homemade beer made in compliance with the limitations specified in subdivision (b)(1) is allowed for purposes of exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, or sampling or as part of a contest or competition, if the exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, sampling, contest, or competition is held at a private residence or on a licensed premises. Homemade beer used for purposes described in this subsection (c), including the submission or consumption of such beer, shall not be considered sold or offered for sale, and any prize awarded at a contest or competition or as a result of an exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, or sampling shall not be considered compensation. No fee may be charged for consumption of the homemade beer at the exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, sampling, contest, or competition; provided, however, an entrance fee may be charged to persons attending an exhibition, contest, or competition.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person who is not a permit holder under this chapter may, at a private residence, and a person who is a permit holder under this chapter may, on the permitted premises, conduct, sponsor, or host a contest, competition, or other event for the exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, or sampling of homemade beer made in compliance with the limitations specified in subdivision (b)(1) if the person does not sell the beer and, unless the person is the maker of the beer, does not acquire any ownership interest in the beer.

No fee may be charged for consumption of homemade beer at the contest, competition, or other event; provided, however, an entrance fee may be charged to persons attending a contest, competition, or other event.

If the contest, competition, or other event is held on a permitted premises, the permit holder may allow the homemade beer to be stored on the premises if the homemade beer is clearly identified and kept separate from any alcoholic beverages or beer owned by the permit holder. Any homemade beer stored on the premises shall be removed within twenty-four (24) hours after the contest, competition, or other event has ended.

Any city or county may regulate contests, competitions, or other events for the exhibition, demonstration, judging, tasting, or sampling of homemade beer as described in subsection (d), including requiring a permit for the contests, competitions, or other events.

No taxes levied or collected pursuant to this title shall be applicable to any homemade beer made in compliance with subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 2015, ch. 69, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-111, concerning the sale of beer by hotels and motels to guests, was transferred to §57-5-107 in 1993.

57-5-112. Beer container size — Labeling.

Any wholesaler or retailer selling or distributing any product regulated under this chapter in a twenty-five and four-tenths ounce (25.4 oz.) container may distribute such container only if the container has affixed to it a label, printed in at least three-sixteenths inches (3/16") type, which states “flavored beer.” Nothing herein shall be construed to impose upon a brewer or importer the duty to affix the labels required under this subsection (a) prior to sale to a wholesaler.

Any retail permittee or licensee under this title which elects to distribute any beer product in a twenty-five and four-tenths ounce (25.4 oz.) container is prohibited from indicating, directly or indirectly, that the product is not a flavored beer product. Any retail permittee or licensee violating this section shall be subject to sanctions imposed by law.

Acts 1997, ch. 560, § 2; 1998, ch. 857, § 1.

57-5-113. Sale of beer allowed any time authorized to sell liquor and wine — Beer permit required.

Any establishment that is permitted to sell liquor or wine for on-premises consumption pursuant to chapter 4 of this title shall be allowed to sell beer at any time the establishment is legally authorized to sell liquor or wine; provided, that the establishment has lawfully obtained a beer permit from the appropriate jurisdiction.

Acts 2011, ch. 27, § 1.

57-5-114. Separate license for distribution of high alcohol content beer not required.

Any wholesale distributor of beer that has a valid wholesale license pursuant to this chapter is not required to obtain a separate license for the distribution of high alcohol content beer from the commission.

Acts 2017, ch. 443, § 4.